District of Columbia statutes.
16-2349.01

Child support pendente lite.

Upon motion of a party in a parentage or support action or proceeding, the Superior Court shall issue an order of child support pending a determination of parentage if there is clear and convincing evidence of parentage. Evidence of parentage may include a genetic test result that does not create a conclusive presumption of parentage pursuant to section 16-909(b-1)(1) .

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 106(t), 48 DCR 1270
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 18-33, § 3(q), 56 DCR 4269
D.C. Law 18-33 substituted “parentage” for “paternity”.

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 5(r) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-103, May 8, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 3254).

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 5(v) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3832).

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 105(v) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-57, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1979).

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 105(v) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).

For temporary addition of § 16-2349.1 1981 Ed., see § 5(r) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. 12-222, December 23, 1997, 44 DCR 114).
For temporary addition of § 16-2349.1 1981 Ed., see § 105(v) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 105(v) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, October 24, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 106(t) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).
Section 28(c)(8) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that the section designation of § 16-2349.1 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as § 16-2349.01.